New York, session 2025-2026, A10115.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (h) of subdivision 1 of section 216 of the real 2 property law, as added by section 1 of part HH of chapter 56 of the laws 3 of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 4 (h) The landlord in good faith seeks to demolish the entire housing 5 accommodation or building, provided that no judgment in favor of the 6 landlord may be granted pursuant to this paragraph unless the landlord 7 establishes good faith to demolish the housing accommodation or building 8 by clear and convincing evidence. The provisions of this paragraph 9 shall not apply where the landlord is attempting to demolish individual 10 housing units within the accommodation or building; 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 12 the amendments to subdivision 1 of section 216 of the real property law 13 made by section one of this act shall not affect the repeal of such 14 section and shall be deemed repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14607-02-6